California statutes. Probate Code
(History: Added by Stats. 2008, Ch. 174, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2009.   Operative January 1, 2010, by Sec. 3 of Ch. 174.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 3.7. Presumption of Fraud or Undue Influence [21360. - 21392.]



  CHAPTER 1. Definitions [21360. - 21374.]

21360.

The definitions in this chapter govern the construction of this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 620, Sec. 7.   (SB 105)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

21362.

(a) “Care custodian” means a person who provides health or social services to a dependent adult, except that “care custodian” does not include a person who provided services without remuneration if the person had a personal relationship with the dependent adult (1) at least 90 days before providing those services, (2) at least six months before the dependent adult’s death, and (3) before the dependant adult was admitted to hospice care, if the dependent adult was admitted to hospice care. As used in this subdivision, “remuneration” does not include the donative transfer at issue under this chapter or the reimbursement of expenses.

(b) For the purposes of this section, “health and social services”
 means services provided to a dependent adult because of the person’s dependent condition, including, but not limited to, the administration of medicine, medical testing, wound care, assistance with hygiene, companionship, housekeeping, shopping, cooking, and assistance with finances.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 620, Sec. 7.   (SB 105)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

21364.

“Cohabitant” has the meaning provided in Section 13700 of the Penal Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 620, Sec. 7.   (SB 105)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

21366.

“Dependent adult” means a person who, at the time of executing the instrument at issue under this part, was a person described in either of the following:

(a) The person was 65 years of age or older and satisfied one or both of the following criteria:

(1) The person was unable to provide properly for his or her personal needs for physical health, food, clothing, or shelter.

(2) Due to one or more deficits in the mental functions listed in paragraphs (1) to (4), inclusive, of subdivision (a) of Section 811, the person had difficulty managing his or her own financial resources or resisting fraud
 or undue influence.

(b) The person was 18 years of age or older and satisfied one or both of the following criteria:

(1) The person was unable to provide properly for his or her personal needs for physical health, food, clothing, or shelter.

(2) Due to one or more deficits in the mental functions listed in paragraphs (1) to (4), inclusive, of subdivision (a) of Section 811, the person had substantial difficulty managing his or her own financial resources or resisting fraud or undue influence.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 620, Sec. 7.   (SB 105)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

21368.

“Domestic partner” has the meaning provided in Section 297 of the Family Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 620, Sec. 7.   (SB 105)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

21370.

“Independent attorney” means an attorney who has no legal, business, financial, professional, or personal relationship with the beneficiary of a donative transfer at issue under this part, and who would not be appointed as a fiduciary or receive any pecuniary benefit as a result of the operation of the instrument containing the donative transfer at issue under this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 620, Sec. 7.   (SB 105)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

21374.

(a) A person who is “related by blood or affinity” to a specified person means any of the following persons:

(1) A spouse or domestic partner of the specified person.

(2) A relative within a specified degree of kinship to the specified person or within a specified degree of kinship to the spouse or domestic partner of the specified person.

(3) The spouse or domestic partner of a person described in paragraph (2).

(b) For the purposes of this section, “spouse or domestic partner” includes a predeceased spouse
 or predeceased domestic partner.

(c) In determining a relationship under this section, Sections 6406 and 6407, and Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 6450) of Part 2 of Division 6, are applicable.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 620, Sec. 7.   (SB 105)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Operation and Effect of Presumption [21380. - 21392.]

21380.

(a) A provision of an instrument making a donative transfer to any of the following persons is presumed to be the product of fraud or undue influence:

(1) The person who drafted the instrument.

(2) A person who transcribed the instrument or caused it to be transcribed and who was in a fiduciary relationship with the transferor when the instrument was transcribed.

(3) A care custodian of a transferor who is a dependent adult, but only if the instrument was executed during the period in which the care custodian provided services to the transferor, or within 90 days before or after that period.

(4) A care custodian who commenced a marriage, cohabitation, or domestic partnership with a transferor who is a dependent adult while providing services to that dependent adult, or within 90 days after those services were last provided to the dependent adult, if the donative transfer occurred, or the instrument was executed, less than six months after the marriage, cohabitation, or domestic partnership commenced.

(5) A person who is related by blood or affinity, within the third degree, to any person described in
 paragraphs (1) to (3), inclusive.

(6) A cohabitant or employee of any person described in paragraphs (1) to (3), inclusive.

(7) A partner, shareholder, or employee of a law firm in which a person described in paragraph (1) or (2) has an ownership interest.

(b) The
 presumption created by this section is a presumption affecting the burden of proof. The presumption may be rebutted by proving, by clear and convincing evidence, that the donative transfer was not the product of fraud or undue influence.

(c) Notwithstanding subdivision (b), with respect to a donative transfer to the person who drafted the donative instrument, or to a person who is related to, or associated with, the drafter as described in paragraph (5), (6), or (7) of subdivision (a), the presumption created by this section is conclusive.

(d) If a beneficiary is unsuccessful in rebutting the presumption, the beneficiary shall bear all costs of the proceeding, including
 reasonable attorney’s fees.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 10, Sec. 1.   (AB 328)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

21382.

Section 21380 does not apply to any of the following instruments or transfers:

(a) Except as provided in paragraph (4) of subdivision (a) of Section 21380, a donative transfer to a person who is related by blood or affinity, within the fourth degree, to the transferor or is the cohabitant of the transferor.

(b) An instrument that is drafted or transcribed by a person who is related by blood or affinity, within the fourth degree, to the transferor or is the cohabitant of the transferor.

(c) An instrument that is approved pursuant to an order under Article 10 (commencing with Section 2580) of Chapter 6 of Part 4 of Division 4, after full disclosure of the relationships of the persons involved.

(d) A donative transfer to a federal, state, or local public entity, an entity that qualifies for an exemption from taxation under Section 501(c)(3) or 501(c)(19) of the Internal Revenue Code, or a trust holding the transferred property for the entity.

(e) A donative transfer of property valued at five thousand dollars ($5,000) or less, if the total value of the transferor’s estate equals or exceeds the amount stated in Section 13100.

(f) An instrument executed outside of California by a transferor who was not a resident of California when the
 instrument was executed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 10, Sec. 2.   (AB 328)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

21384.

(a) A donative transfer is not subject to Section 21380 if the instrument is reviewed by an independent attorney who counsels the transferor, out of the presence of any heir or proposed beneficiary, about the nature and consequences of the intended transfer, including the effect of the intended transfer on the transferor’s heirs and on any beneficiary of a prior donative instrument, attempts to determine if the intended transfer is the result of fraud or undue influence, and signs and delivers to the transferor an original certificate in substantially the following form:“CERTIFICATE OF INDEPENDENT REVIEWI, , have reviewed(attorney’s name)and have counseled the transferor,(name of instrument), on the nature and consequences of any(name of transferor)transfers of property to (name of person described in Section 21380 of the
 Probate Code)that would be made by the instrument.I am an “independent attorney” as defined in Section 21370 of the Probate Code and am in a position to advise the transferor independently, impartially, and confidentially as to the consequences of the transfer.On the basis of this counsel, I conclude that the transfers to that would(name of person described in Section 21380 of the Probate Code)be made by the instrument are not the product of fraud or undue influence.

”(Name of Attorney)(Date)(b) An attorney whose written engagement, signed by the transferor, is expressly limited solely to compliance with the requirements of this section, shall not be considered to otherwise represent the transferor as a client.

(c) An attorney who drafts an instrument can review and certify the same instrument pursuant to this section, but only as to a donative transfer to a care custodian. In all other circumstances, an attorney who drafts an instrument may
 not review and certify the instrument.

(d) If the certificate is prepared by an attorney other than the attorney who drafted the instrument that is under review, a copy of the signed certification shall be provided to the drafting attorney.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 56, Sec. 2.   (SB 153)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

21385.

(a) An at-death transfer, as defined in Section 21104, between spouses by will, revocable trust, beneficiary form, or other instrument is not subject to Section 721 of the Family Code or any presumptions of undue influence created by that section.

(b) This section does not limit the application of any other statutory or common law presumptions of undue influence that may apply to an at-death transfer between spouses.

(History: Added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 43, Sec. 2.   (AB 327)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

21386.

If a donative transfer fails under this part, the instrument making the donative transfer shall operate as if the beneficiary had predeceased the transferor without spouse, domestic partner, or issue.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 56, Sec. 3.   (SB 153)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

21388.

(a) A person is not liable for transferring property pursuant to an instrument that is subject to the presumption created under this part, unless the person is served with notice, prior to transferring the property, that the instrument has been contested under this part.

(b) A person who is served with notice that an instrument has been contested under this part is not liable for failing to transfer property pursuant to the instrument, unless the person is served with notice that the validity of the transfer has been conclusively determined by a court.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 620, Sec. 7.   (SB 105)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

21390.

This part applies notwithstanding a contrary provision in an instrument.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 620, Sec. 7.   (SB 105)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

21392.

(a) This part shall apply to instruments that become irrevocable on or after January 1, 2011. For the purposes of this section, an instrument that is otherwise revocable or amendable shall be deemed to be irrevocable if, on or after January 1, 2011, the transferor by reason of incapacity was unable to change the disposition of the transferor’s property and did not regain capacity before the date of the transferor’s death.

(b) It is the intent of the Legislature that this part supplement the common law on fraud and undue influence, without superseding or interfering in the operation of that law. Nothing in this part precludes an action to contest a donative transfer under the common law or under any other applicable law. This subdivision is declarative of existing
 law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 56, Sec. 4.   (SB 153)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 4. ABATEMENT [21400. - 21406.]

21400.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this part, if the instrument provides for abatement, or if the transferor’s plan or if the purpose of the transfer would be defeated by abatement as provided in this part, the shares of beneficiaries abate as is necessary to effectuate the instrument, plan, or purpose.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

21401.

Except as provided in Sections 21612 (omitted spouse) and 21623 (omitted children) and in Division 10 (commencing with Section 20100) (proration of taxes), shares of beneficiaries abate as provided in this part for all purposes, including payment of the debts, expenses, and charges specified in Section 11420, satisfaction of gifts, and payment of expenses on specifically devised property pursuant to Section 12002, and without any priority as between real and personal property.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 32, Sec. 15.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

21402.

(a) Shares of beneficiaries abate in the following order:

(1) Property not disposed of by the instrument.

(2) Residuary gifts.

(3) General gifts to persons other than the transferor’s relatives.

(4) General gifts to the transferor’s relatives.

(5) Specific gifts to persons other than the transferor’s relatives.

(6) Specific gifts to the transferor’s relatives.

(b) For purposes of this section, a “relative” of the transferor is a person to whom property would pass from the transferor under Section 6401 or 6402 (intestate succession) if the transferor died intestate and there were no other person having priority.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

21403.

(a) Subject to subdivision (b), shares of beneficiaries abate pro rata within each class specified in Section 21402.

(b) Gifts of annuities and demonstrative gifts are treated as specific gifts to the extent they are satisfied out of the fund or property specified in the gift and as general gifts to the extent they are satisfied out of property other than the fund or property specified in the gift.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

21404.

If an instrument requires property that is the subject of a specific gift to be exonerated from a mortgage, deed of trust, or other lien, a specific gift of other property does not abate for the purpose of exonerating the encumbered property.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

21405.

(a) In any case in which there is abatement when a distribution is made during estate administration, the court shall fix the amount each distributee must contribute for abatement. The personal representative shall reduce the distributee’s share by that amount.

(b) If a specific gift must be abated, the beneficiary of the specific gift may satisfy the contribution for abatement out of the beneficiary’s property other than the property that is the subject of the specific gift.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

21406.

(a) This part does not apply to a gift made before July 1, 1989. In the case of a gift made before July 1, 1989, the law that would have applied had this part not been enacted shall apply.

(b) For purposes of this section a gift by will is made on the date of the decedent’s death.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 5. COMPLIANCE WITH INTERNAL REVENUE CODE [21500. - 21541.]



  CHAPTER 1. General Provisions [21500. - 21503.]

21500.

As used in this part, “Internal Revenue Code” means the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended from time to time. A reference to a provision of the Internal Revenue Code includes any subsequent provision of law enacted in its place.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

21501.

(a) This part applies to a distribution made on or after January 1, 1988, whether the transferor died before, on, or after that date.

(b) A distribution made on or after January 1, 1983, and before January 1, 1988, is governed by the applicable law in effect before January 1, 1988.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

21502.

(a) This part does not apply to an instrument the terms of which expressly or by necessary implication make this part inapplicable.

(b) By an appropriate statement made in an instrument, the transferor may incorporate by reference any or all of the provisions of this part. The effect of incorporating a provision of this part in an instrument is to make the incorporated provision a part of the instrument as though the language of the incorporated provision were set forth verbatim in the instrument. Unless an instrument incorporating a provision of this part provides otherwise, the instrument automatically incorporates the provision’s amendments.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

21503.

(a) If an instrument includes a formula intended to eliminate the federal estate tax, the formula shall be applied to eliminate or to reduce to the maximum extent possible the federal estate tax.

(b) If an instrument includes a formula that refers to a maximum fraction or amount that will not result in a federal estate tax, the formula shall be construed to refer to the maximum fraction or amount that will not result in or increase the federal estate tax.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Marital Deduction Gifts [21520. - 21526.]

21520.

As used in this chapter:

(a) “Marital deduction” means the federal estate tax deduction allowed for transfers under Section 2056 of the Internal Revenue Code or the federal gift tax deduction allowed for transfers under Section 2523 of the Internal Revenue Code.

(b) “Marital deduction gift” means a transfer of property that is intended to qualify for the marital deduction.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

21521.

Sections 21524 and 21526 do not apply to a trust that qualifies for the marital deduction under Section 20.2056(e)-2(b) of the Code of Federal Regulations (commonly referred to as the “estate trust”).

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

21522.

If an instrument contains a marital deduction gift:

(a) The provisions of the instrument, including any power, duty, or discretionary authority given to a fiduciary, shall be construed to comply with the marital deduction provisions of the Internal Revenue Code.

(b) The fiduciary shall not take any action or have any power that impairs the deduction as applied to the marital deduction gift.

(c) The marital deduction gift may be satisfied only with property that qualifies for the marital deduction.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

21523.

(a) The Economic Recovery Tax Act of 1981 was enacted August 13, 1981. This section applies to an instrument executed before September 12, 1981 (before 30 days after enactment of the Economic Recovery Tax Act of 1981).

(b) If an instrument described in subdivision (a) indicates the transferor’s intention to make a gift that will provide the maximum allowable marital deduction, the instrument passes to the recipient an amount equal to the maximum amount of the marital deduction that would have been allowed as of the date of the gift under federal law as it existed before enactment of the Economic Recovery Tax Act of 1981, with adjustments for the following, if applicable:

(1) The provisions of Section 2056(c)(1)(B) and (C) of the Internal Revenue Code in effect immediately before enactment of the Economic Recovery Tax Act of 1981.

(2) To reduce the amount passing under the gift by the final federal estate tax values of any other property that passes under or outside of the instrument and qualifies for the marital deduction. This subdivision does not apply to qualified terminable interest property under Section 2056(b)(7) of the Internal Revenue Code.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

21524.

If a marital deduction gift is made in trust, in addition to the other provisions of this chapter, each of the following provisions also applies to the marital deduction trust:

(a) The transferor’s spouse is the only beneficiary of income or principal of the marital deduction property as long as the spouse is alive. Nothing in this subdivision precludes exercise by the transferor’s spouse of a power of appointment included in a trust that qualifies as a general power of appointment marital deduction trust.

(b) 
 The transferor’s spouse is entitled to all of the income of the marital deduction property not less frequently than annually, as long as the spouse is alive. For purposes of this subdivision, income shall be construed in a manner consistent with subdivision (b) of Section 2056 and subdivision (f) of Section 2523 of the Internal Revenue Code and shall include a unitrust payment or other allocation of income determined pursuant to a reasonable apportionment of total investment return that meets the requirements of Section 643 of the Internal Revenue Code and the regulations adopted pursuant to that statute.

(c) The transferor’s spouse has the right to require that the trustee of the trust make unproductive marital deduction property productive or to convert it into productive property within a
 reasonable time.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 140, Sec. 1.   (SB 1265)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

21525.

(a) If an instrument that makes a marital deduction gift includes a condition that the transferor’s spouse survive the transferor by a period that exceeds or may exceed six months, other than a condition described in subdivision (b), the condition shall be limited to six months as applied to the marital deduction gift.

(b) If an instrument that makes a marital deduction gift includes a condition that the transferor’s spouse survive a common disaster that results in the death of the transferor, the condition shall be limited to the time of the final audit of the federal estate tax return for the transferor’s estate, if any, as applied to the marital deduction gift.

(c) The amendment of subdivision (a) made by Chapter 113 of the Statutes of 1988 is declaratory of, and not a change in, either existing law or former Section 1036 (repealed by Chapter 923 of the Statutes of 1987).

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

21526.

A fiduciary is not liable for a good faith decision to make any election, or not to make any election, referred to in Section 2056(b)(7) or Section 2523(f) of the Internal Revenue Code.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Charitable Gifts [21540. - 21541.]

21540.

If an instrument indicates the transferor’s intention to comply with the Internal Revenue Code requirements for a charitable remainder unitrust or a charitable remainder annuity trust as each is defined in Section 664 of the Internal Revenue Code, the provisions of the instrument, including any power, duty, or discretionary authority given to a fiduciary, shall be construed to comply with the charitable deduction provisions of Section 2055 or Section 2522 of the Internal Revenue Code and the charitable remainder trust provisions of Section 664 of the Internal Revenue Code in order to conform to that intent. In no event shall the fiduciary take an action or have a power that impairs the charitable deduction. The provisions of the instrument may be augmented in any manner consistent with Section 2055(e) or Section 2522(c) of the Internal Revenue Code on a petition provided for in Section 17200.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

21541.

If an instrument indicates the transferor’s intention to comply with the requirements for a charitable lead trust as described in Section 170(f)(2)(B) and Section 2055(e)(2) or Section 2522(c)(2) of the Internal Revenue Code, the provisions of the instrument, including any power, duty, or discretionary authority given to a fiduciary, shall be construed to comply with the provisions of that section in order to conform to that intent. In no event shall the fiduciary take any action or have any power that impairs the charitable deduction. The provisions of the instrument may be augmented in any manner consistent with that intent upon a petition provided for in Section 17200.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 6. FAMILY PROTECTION: OMITTED SPOUSES AND CHILDREN [21600. - 21630.]



  CHAPTER 1. General Provisions [21600. - 21601.]

21600.

This part shall apply to property passing by will through a decedent’s estate or by a trust, as defined in Section 82, that becomes irrevocable only on the death of the settlor.

(History: Added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 724, Sec. 34.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

21601.

(a) For purposes of this part, “decedent’s testamentary instruments” means the decedent’s will or revocable trust.

(b) “Estate” as used in this part shall include a decedent’s probate estate and all property held in any revocable trust that becomes irrevocable on the death of the decedent.

(History: Added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 724, Sec. 34.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Omitted Spouses [21610. - 21612.]

21610.

Except as provided in Section 21611, if a decedent fails to provide in a testamentary instrument for the decedent’s surviving spouse who married the decedent after the execution of all of the decedent’s testamentary instruments, the omitted spouse shall receive a share in the decedent’s estate, consisting of the following property in said estate:

(a) The one-half of the community property that belongs to the decedent under Section 100.

(b) The one-half of the quasi-community property that belongs to the decedent under Section 101.

(c) A share of the separate property of the decedent equal in value to that which the spouse would have received if the decedent had died without having executed a testamentary instrument, but in no event is the share to be more than one-half the value of the separate property in the estate.

(History: Added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 724, Sec. 34.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

21611.

The spouse shall not receive a share of the estate under Section 21610 if any of the following is established:

(a) The decedent’s failure to provide for the spouse in the decedent’s testamentary instruments was intentional and that intention appears from the testamentary instruments.

(b) The decedent provided for the spouse by transfer outside of the estate passing by the decedent’s testamentary instruments and the intention that the transfer be in lieu of a provision in said instruments is shown by statements of the decedent or from the amount of the transfer or by other evidence.

(c) The spouse made a valid agreement
 waiving the right to share in the decedent’s estate.

(d) (1) If both of the following apply:

(A) The spouse was a care custodian, as that term is defined in Section 21362, of the decedent who was a dependent adult, as that term is defined in Section 21366, and the marriage commenced while the care custodian provided services to the decedent, or within 90 days after those services were last provided to the decedent.

(B) The decedent died less than six months after the marriage commenced.

(2) Notwithstanding paragraph (1), a spouse described by this subdivision shall be entitled to receive a share of the estate pursuant to Section 21610 if the spouse proves by clear and convincing evidence that the marriage between the spouse and the decedent was not the product of fraud or undue influence.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 10, Sec. 3.   (AB 328)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

21612.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b), in satisfying a share provided by this chapter:

(1) The share will first be taken from the decedent’s estate not disposed of by will or trust, if any.

(2) If that is not sufficient, so much as may be necessary to satisfy the share shall be taken from all beneficiaries of decedent’s testamentary instruments in proportion to the value they may respectively receive. The proportion of each beneficiary’s share that may be taken pursuant to this subdivision shall be determined based on values as of the date of the decedent’s death.

(b) If the obvious intention of the decedent in relation to some specific gift or devise or other provision of a testamentary instrument would be defeated by the application of subdivision (a), the specific devise or gift or provision may be exempted from the apportionment under subdivision (a), and a different apportionment, consistent with the intention of the decedent, may be adopted.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 26112 by Stats. 2003, Ch. 32, Sec. 17.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Omitted Children [21620. - 21623.]

21620.

Except as provided in Section 21621, if a decedent fails to provide in a testamentary instrument for a child of decedent born or adopted after the execution of all of the decedent’s testamentary instruments, the omitted child shall receive a share in the decedent’s estate equal in value to that which the child would have received if the decedent had died without having executed any testamentary instrument.

(History: Added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 724, Sec. 34.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

21621.

A child shall not receive a share of the estate under Section 21620 if any of the following is established:

(a) The decedent’s failure to provide for the child in the decedent’s testamentary instruments was intentional and that intention appears from the testamentary instruments.

(b) The decedent had one or more children and devised or otherwise directed the disposition of substantially all the estate to the other parent of the omitted child.

(c) The decedent provided for the child by transfer outside of the estate passing by the decedent’s testamentary instruments and the intention that the transfer be in lieu of a
 provision in said instruments is shown by statements of the decedent or from the amount of the transfer or by other evidence.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 80, Sec. 108.5.   (SB 1525)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

21622.

If, at the time of the execution of all of decedent’s testamentary instruments effective at the time of decedent’s death, the decedent failed to provide for a living child solely because the decedent believed the child to be dead or was unaware of the birth of the child, the child shall receive a share in the estate equal in value to that which the child would have received if the decedent had died without having executed any testamentary instruments.

(History: Added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 724, Sec. 34.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

21623.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b), in satisfying a share provided by this chapter:

(1) The share will first be taken from the decedent’s estate not disposed of by will or trust, if any.

(2) If that is not sufficient, so much as may be necessary to satisfy the share shall be taken from all beneficiaries of decedent’s testamentary instruments in proportion to the value they may respectively receive. The proportion of each beneficiary’s share that may be taken pursuant to this subdivision shall be determined based on values as of the date of the decedent’s death.

(b) If the obvious intention of the decedent in relation to some specific gift or devise or other provision of a testamentary instrument would be defeated by the application of subdivision (a), the specific devise or gift or provision of a testamentary instrument may be exempted from the apportionment under subdivision (a), and a different apportionment, consistent with the intention of the decedent, may be adopted.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 32, Sec. 16.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4. Applicability [21630. - 21630.]

21630.

This part does not apply if the decedent died before January 1, 1998. The law applicable prior to January 1, 1998, applies if the decedent died before January 1, 1998.

(History: Added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 724, Sec. 34.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 7. CONTRACTS REGARDING TESTAMENTARY OR INTESTATE SUCCESSION [21700. - 21700.]

21700.

(a) A contract to make a will or devise or other instrument, or not to revoke a will or devise or other instrument, or to die intestate, if made after the effective date of this statute, can be established only by one of the following:

(1) Provisions of a will or other instrument stating the material provisions of the contract.

(2) An expressed reference in a will or other instrument to a contract and extrinsic evidence proving the terms of the contract.

(3) A writing signed by the decedent evidencing the contract.

(4) Clear and convincing evidence of an agreement between the decedent and the claimant or a promise by the decedent to the claimant that is enforceable in equity.

(5) Clear and convincing evidence of an agreement between the decedent and another person for the benefit of the claimant or a promise by the decedent to another person for the benefit of the claimant that is enforceable in equity.

(b) The execution of a joint will or mutual wills does not create a presumption of a contract not to revoke the will or wills.

(c) A contract to make a will or devise or other instrument, or not to revoke a will or devise or other instrument, or to die intestate, if made prior to the effective date of this section, shall be construed under the law applicable to the contract prior to the effective date of this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 17, Sec. 8.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

